North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 5. Department of Public Instruction.

§§ 143A-39 through 143A-42.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 522, s. 14.

§ 143A-43.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 768, s. 14.

§ 143A-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 522, s. 14.

§ 143A-44.1.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of Public Instruction. The head of the Department of Public Instruction is the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

1995, c. 72, s. 3; 2008-187, s. 24; 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 10.

Repeal State Board of Education Policies Inconsistent with State Law, as affirmed by NC Supreme Court.

Session Laws 2018-114, s. 27(a), provides: “The General Assembly finds that the North Carolina Supreme Court, in
North Carolina State Board of Education v. State of North Carolina and Mark Johnson,
No. 333PA17 (June 8, 2018), affirmed the facial constitutionality of S.L. 2016-126 in clarifying the authority of the Superintendent of Public Instruction as the administrative head of the Department of Public Instruction and the Superintendent’s role in the direct supervision of the public school system. SBOP-011 (Responsibilities of the SBE in supervising/administering the public school system of NC and the funds provided for its support) and SBOP-013 (Delegation of Authority from the State Board of Education to the Superintendent of Public Instruction) are repealed. The State Board of Education may readopt rules or policies related to internal management that are not inconsistent with the statutory requirements of S.L. 2016-126, including, but not limited to, the requirements of

G.S. 115C-11

, 115C-19, 115C-21, and 143A-441.”

§ 143A-44.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 11, effective January 1, 2017.

History.

1995, c. 72, s. 3; repealed by 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 11, effective January 1, 2017.

§ 143A-44.3.
Superintendent of Public Instruction; creation; transfer of powers and duties.

The office of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, as provided for by Article III, Section 7 of the Constitution, and the Department of Public Instruction are transferred to the Department of Public Instruction. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be the Secretary and Chief Administrative Officer of the State Board of Education, and shall have all powers and duties conferred by this Chapter and the Constitution, delegated to him or her by the Governor and by the State Board of Education, and conferred by Chapter 115C of the General Statutes and the laws of this State.

History.

1995, c. 72, s. 3; 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 12.

§ 143A-45.
Interstate Compact for Education; rights, duties and privileges.

All of the rights, duties and privileges of this State obtained as a party to the Interstate Compact for Education as contained in Part 5 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, shall be supervised and administered by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 7; 1983, c. 768, s. 16.

§ 143A-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 768, s. 14.

§ 143A-47.
Interstate Agreement on Qualifications of Educational Personnel; rights, duties and privileges.

All of the rights, duties and privileges of this State obtained as a party to the Interstate Agreement on Qualifications of Educational Personnel as contained in Article 24 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes and the laws of this State shall be supervised and administered by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 7; 1983, c. 768, s. 17.

§ 143A-48.
Textbook Commission; transfer.

The Textbook Commission, as created by

G.S. 115C-87

and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Public Instruction.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 7; 1983, c. 768, s. 18; 1993, c. 522, s. 15.

§ 143A-48.1.
North Carolina Council on the Holocaust; creation; purpose; membership; expenses; assistance.

There is hereby created the North Carolina Council on the Holocaust. The purpose of the Council is to prevent future atrocities similar to the systematic program of genocide of six million Jews and others by the Nazis. This purpose shall be accomplished by developing a program of education and observance of the Holocaust.

The Council shall consist of 24 members, six appointed by the Governor, six appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, six appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and six appointed by the other 18 members. Members shall be appointed for two-year terms to begin July 1 of each odd-numbered year. The six at-large appointments shall be made by the Council at its first meeting after July 1 of each odd-numbered year. To be eligible for appointment as an at-large member, a person must either be a survivor of the Holocaust or a first-generation lineal descendant of such person. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The members of the Council shall be compensated and reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may arrange for clerical or other assistance required by the Council.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 81(a); 1989, c. 47; 1995, c. 490, s. 23; 2002-126, s. 10.10D(a), (b).